Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1809
Medical nutrition therapy, defined.

Medical nutrition therapy means the assessment of the nutritional status of patients and the provision of the following nutrition-care services for the treatment or management of a disease or medical condition by:

(1) Assessing and evaluating the nutritional needs of people and groups and determining resources and constraints in the practice setting, including ordering laboratory tests to check and track nutrition status, creating dietary plans and orders, and monitoring the effectiveness of such plans and orders;

(2) Establishing priorities, goals, and objectives that meet nutritional needs and are consistent with available resources and constraints;

(3) Providing nutrition counseling; and

(4) Ordering therapeutic diets.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 631;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 33.